Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-905
Department; control of adult corrections and secure youth facility.

The Department of Correctional Services shall have oversight and general control of all state adult correctional institutions and the secure youth facility. The Secure Youth Confinement Facility is a physically secure, coeducational facility designed to provide secure confinement, education, and treatment only for serious and chronic juvenile offenders who have been committed to the Department of Correctional Services for secure care.

Laws 1973, LB 563, § 57;

Laws 1974, LB 994, § 1;

Laws 1980, LB 794, § 4;

Laws 1993, LB 31, § 65;

Laws 1994, LB 988, § 40;

Laws 1997, LB 882, § 9.